District of Columbia statutes.
26-1215

Remedies.

(a)

The Superintendent [Commissioner] shall report violations of any provision of this chapter to the Corporation Counsel. The Corporation Counsel may institute a civil action on behalf of the District for equitable or any other appropriate relief, including the imposition of civil fines provided in this section, unless different procedures or means of obtaining relief are specified in this chapter for the violation.

(b)

Any person violating any provision of this chapter or any rule issued pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000 per day for each day the violation continues, up to a maximum of $30,000 for a single violation, unless a different penalty is specified in § 26-1204(d)(4)(A), § 26-1204(d)(4)(B) or § 26-1205(g)(4)(B) for the violation, in which case the specified penalty shall apply.

(c)

Any person who wilfully violates this chapter or any rule issued pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to a civil fine of not more than $5,000 a day for each day the violation continues, up to a maximum of $150,000, unless a different penalty is specified in § 26-1204(d)(4)(A), § 26-1204(d)(4)(B) or § 26-1205(g)(4)(B) for the violation, in which case the specified penalty shall apply.

Oct. 12, 1988, D.C. Law 7-175, § 16, 35 DCR 6133
1981 Ed., § 26-915.